Hawaii statutes.
§576B-505 Penalties for noncompliance.
An employer that wilfully fails to comply with an income withholding order
issued in another state and received for enforcement shall be subject to the
same penalties that may be imposed for noncompliance with an order issued by a
tribunal of this State. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next